Oklahoma, session 2025, SB357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 104 of Title 66, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “Emergency Response Guidebook”


means the manual intended for use during the initial phase of a


transportation incident involving hazardous materials or dangerous


goods published by the United States Department of Transportation.


B. Any person, firm, or corporation operating a railroad train


in connection with carrying freight in this state shall be required


to maintain physical copies aboard each railroad train operated by


the person, firm, or corporation of:

Req. No. 1068 Page 1


1. The cargo manifest of the train;


2. The Emergency Response Guidebook; and


3. Identification cards that show the qualifications of each


member of the train crew aboard the train.


C. The Department of Public Safety may issue a citation to any


person, firm, or corporation that violates the provisions of this


section. Such person, firm, or corporation shall be subject to a


fine of:


1. Not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) but not


more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a first offense;


2. More than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) but not to exceed


Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a second offense committed


within three (3) years; or


3. More than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) but not to


exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for a third or subsequent


offense committed within three (3) years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1068 MSBB 1/3/2025 4:28:49 PM











Req. No. 1068 Page 2